vi: Thiết kế nhẫn: Vòng đeo tay; Đính cườm; Birthstone; Xích; Charm; Claddagh; Cocktail; Cổ tay áo; Vĩnh cửu; Hào quang; Hàng; Signet; Solitaire; Có thể xếp chồng; Quần vợt; Ba viên đá; Khác
de: Ringdesign: Band; Perlen; Geburtsstein; Kette; Anhänger; Claddagh; Cocktail; Manschette; Ewigkeit; Halo; Reihe; Siegel; Solitär; Stapelbar; Tennis; Drei-Stein; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 戒指设计: 无饰戒指; 串珠戒指; 生辰石戒指; 链式戒指; 吊坠戒指; 克拉达戒指; 鸡尾酒戒指; 开口式戒指; 永恒戒指; 光环戒指; 排镶戒指; 玺戒/印章戒指; 单钻戒指; 可叠放; 网球用品; 三石戒指; 其他
cs: Design prstenu: Pásek; Korálkové; Rodný kámen; Řetěz; Kouzlo; Claddagh; Koktejl; Manžeta; Věčnost; Svatozář; Řádek; Pečeť; Solitaire; Stohovatelné; Tenis; Triáda; Jiné
sv: Design på ring: Band; Med pärlor; Födelsesten; Kedja; Berlock; Claddagh; Cocktail; Manschett; Eternity; Halo; Rad; Signet; Solitaire; Stapelbar; Tennis; Tre stenar; Övrigt
nb: Ringdesign: Bånd; Perle; Birthstone; Kjede; Sjarm; Claddagh; Cocktail; Mansjett; Evighet; Halo; Rad; Signet; Kabal; Kan stables; Tennis; Trestein; Annet
en: Ring design: Band; Beaded; Birthstone; Chain; Charm; Claddagh; Cocktail; Cuff; Eternity; Halo; Row; Signet; Solitaire; Stackable; Tennis; Three-stone; Other
tr: Yüzük tasarımı: Bant; Boncuklu; Doğum taşı; Zincir; Kolye ucu; Claddagh; Kokteyl; Manşet; sonsuzluk; Halo; Sıra; Mühür; Solitaire; İstiflenebilir; Tenis; Üç taşlı; Diğer
fr: Conception de la bague: Bande; Perlé; Pierre de naissance; Chaîne; Breloque; Claddagh; Cocktail; Manchette; Éternité; Halo; Rangée; Sceau; Solitaire; Empilable; Tennis; Trois pierres; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja pierścionka: W kształcie litery C; Koralikowy; Z kamieniem urodzinowym; Łańcuszkowy; Z zawieszkami; Claddagh; Koktajlowy; Bransoletkowy; Z kamieniami wokół obrączki; Halo; Z rzędem kamieni szlachetnych; Sygnet; Klasyczny z jednym kamieniem; Nakładające się; Tenis; Z trzema kamieniami; Inne
nl: Ontwerp ring: Band; Kralen; Geboortesteen; Ketting; Bedeltje; Claddagh; Cocktail; Manchet; Eeuwigheid; Halo; Rij; Signet; Solitaire; Stapelbaar; Tennis; Driesteenig; Andere
da: Ringedesign: Bånd; Perlebesat; Birthstone; Kæde; Vedhæng; Claddagh; Cocktail; Cuff; Evigheds-; Halo; Række; Signet; Solitaire; Stabelbar; Tennis; Trestens-; Andet
zh-TW: 環圈設計: 帶子; 串珠; 誕生石; 鏈條; 吊飾; 克拉達; 雞尾酒; 袖口; 永恆; 光環; 排; 印章; 紙牌; 可堆疊; 網球; 三石; 其他
es: Diseño de anillo: Banda; Con cuentas; Piedra del zodíaco; Cadena; Dije; Claddagh; Cóctel; Brazalete; Eternity; Halo; Fila; Sello; Solitario; Apilable; Tenis; Tres piedras; Otros
bg-BG: Дизайн на пръстен: Сватбен; С мъниста; Рожден камък; Верига; Късмет; Кладаг; Коктейл; Маншет; Вечност; Ореол; Халка; С печат; Единичен камък; За подреждане; Тенис; Три камъка; Други
pt-PT: Desenho de anel: Banda; Com contas; Pedra de nascimento; Corrente; Charme; Claddagh; Cocktail; Punho; Eternidade; Halo; Linha; Sinete; Solitário; Empilhável; Ténis; Três pedras; Outro
th: การออกแบบแหวน: แหวนเพชรแถว; แหวนลูกปัด; แหวนราศีเกิด; แหวนโซ่; Charm; Claddagh; Cocktail; Cuff; Eternity; Halo; Row; Signet; Solitaire; วางซ้อนกันได้; เทนนิส; Three-stone; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Design de anel: Banda; De contas; Pedra de nascimento; Corrente; Amuleto; Claddagh; Coquetel; Bracelete aberto; Eternidade; Auréola; Linha; Sinete; Solitário; Empilhável; Tênis; Três pedras; Outro
el: Σχέδιο δαχτυλιδιού: Ταινία; Με χάντρες; Πετράδι για τον μήνα γέννησης; Αλυσίδα; Με φυλαχτό; Claddagh; Κοκτέιλ; Χειροπέδα; Αιωνιότητας; Φωτοστέφανο; Σειρά; Σφραγιδόλιθος; Μονόπετρο; Στοιβαζόμενος; Τένις; Τρίπετρο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Žiedo dizainas: Vestuvinis; Su karoliukais; Gimimo akmuo; Grandinėlė; Pakabukas; Tradicinis „Claddagh“; Kokteilinis; Platus; Amžinybės; „Halo“; Eilutė; Signetas; Soliteras; Komplektuojami; Minimalistinis; Trijų akmenų; Kita
ko: 반지 디자인: 밴드; 구슬 장식; 탄생석; 체인; 참; 클라다; 칵테일; 커프; 영원; 후광; 열; 도장; 솔리테르; 쌓을 수 있음; 테니스; 쓰리스톤; 기타
ja: リング設計: バンド; ビーズ; 誕生石; チェーン; チャーム; クラダ; カクテル; カフ; エタニティ; ハロー; ロウ; 印章; ソリティア; 積み重ね可能; テニス; スリーストーン; その他
hu: Gyűrű kialakítása: Szalag; Gyöngyös; Születési kő; Lánc; Charm; Claddagh; Koktél; Karika; Örökkévalóság; Halo; Sor; Pecsét; Szoliter; Egymásra rakható; Tenisz; Háromköves; Egyéb
ru: Дизайн кольца: Браслет; Бисерный; Камень по рождению; Цепь; Подвеска; Кладдаг; Коктейль; Манжета; Бесконечность; Гало; Ряд; Печатка; С одним камнем; Составное; Теннис; С тремя камнями; Другое
hr-HR: Dizajn prstena: Vjenčani; Perlice; Kamen rođenja; Lančić; Privjesak; Claddagh; Koktel; Kruti; Eternity; Halo; Row; Pečatnjak; Zaručnički; Može se slagati; Tennis; Tri kamena; Ostalo
sk-SK: Dizajn prsteňa: Kapela; Korálky; Rodný kameň; Reťaz; Prívesok; Claddagh; Koktail; Manžeta; Večnosť; Halo; Riadok; Pečatný prsteň; Solitér; Stohovateľný; Tenisový; Trojkamenný; Iné
it: Modello ad anello: Banda; Perline; Pietra portafortuna; Catena; Braccialetto; Claddagh; Cocktail; Polsino; Eternità; Halo; Riga; Sigillo; Solitaire; Impilabile; Tennis; Tre pietre; Altro
fi: Renkaan suunnittelu: Rengas; Helmitetty; Syntymäkivi; Ketju; Riipus; Claddagh; Cocktail; Kalvosin; Ikuisuus; Halo; Rivi; Sinetti; Solitaire; Pinottava; Tennis; Kolmilankainen; Muu
sl-SI: Dizajn prstanov: Obroč; S perlami; Rojstni kamen; Verižica; Obesek; Claddagh; Koktajl; Manšetni; Simbol za neskončnost; Halo; Enovrstični; Signet; En diamant; Zložljiv; Teniška; Tri-kamen; Drugo
ro-RO: Design inel: Verighetă; Cu mărgele; Piatră norocoasă; Lanț; Talisman; Claddagh; Cocktail; Cuff; Eternity; Halo; Model liniar; Signet; Solitaire; De suprapus; Tenis; Trei pietre; Altele